North Carolina, session 2025, HB575.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 15A-1368(a)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) Maximum imposed term. – The maximum term of imprisonment imposed on
an individual prisoner by a court judgment, as described in
G.S. 15A-1340.13(c). When a prisoner is serving consecutive prison terms,
the maximum imposed term, for purposes of this Article, is the sum of all
maximum terms imposed in the court judgment or judgments, less 12 months
for each of the second and subsequent sentences imposed for Class B through
Class E felonies, or less 60 months for each second or subsequent Class B1
through E felony for which the sentence was established pursuant to
G.S. 15A-1340.17(f), and less nine months for each of the second and
subsequent sentences imposed for Class F through Class I felonies.the
following:
a. Sixty months for each of the second and subsequent sentences imposed
for Class B1 through Class E felonies for which the sentence was
established pursuant to G.S. 15A-1340.17(f).
b. Twenty-four months for each of the second and subsequent sentences
imposed for Class B1 through Class C felonies not otherwise covered
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.
c. Eighteen months for each of the second and subsequent sentences
imposed for Class D through Class E felonies not otherwise covered
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.
d. Nine months for each of the second and subsequent sentences imposed
for Class F through Class I felonies."
SECTION 2. G.S. 15A-1368.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-1368.2. Post-release supervision eligibility and procedure.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a prisoner to whom this Article
applies shall be released from prison for post-release supervision on the date equivalent to his
maximum imposed prison term less 12 24 months in the case of Class B1 through E felons Class
C felons, 18 months in the case of Class D through Class E felons, and less nine months in the
case of Class F through Class I felons, less any earned time awarded by the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction or the custodian of a local confinement facility under
G.S. 15A-1340.13(d). A prisoner whose maximum sentence is established pursuant to
*H575-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 15A-1340.17(f) shall be released from prison for post-release supervision on the date
equivalent to his or her maximum imposed prison term less 60 months, less any earned time
awarded by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or the custodian of a
local confinement facility under G.S. 15A-1340.13(d). If a prisoner has not been awarded any
earned time, the prisoner shall be released for post-release supervision on the date equivalent to
his maximum prison term less 12 24 months for Class B1 through E felons Class C felons, 18
months in the case of Class D through Class E felons, and less nine months for Class F through
Class I felons.
…
(c) A supervisee's period of post-release supervision shall be for a period of 12 24 months
in the case of Class B1 through E felons Class C felons, 18 months in the case of Class D through
Class E felons, and nine months in the case of Class F through Class I felons, unless the offense
is an offense for which registration is required pursuant to Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the
General Statutes. For offenses subject to the registration requirement of Article 27A of Chapter
14 of the General Statutes, the period of post-release supervision is five years. The conditions of
post-release supervision are as authorized in G.S. 15A-1368.4.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 15A-1340.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-1340.17. Punishment limits for each class of offense and prior record level.
…
(d) Maximum Sentences Specified for Class F through Class I Felonies. – Unless
provided otherwise in a statute establishing a punishment for a specific crime, for each minimum
term of imprisonment in the chart in subsection (c) of this section, expressed in months, the
corresponding maximum term of imprisonment, also expressed in months, is as specified in the
table below for Class F through Class I felonies. The first figure in each cell in the table is the
minimum term and the second is the maximum term.
3-13 4-14 5-15 6-17 7-18 8-19 9-20 10-21
11-23 12-24 13-25 14-26 15-27 16-29 17-30 18-31
19-32 20-33 21-35 22-36 23-37 24-38 25-39 26-41
27-42 28-43 29-44 30-45 31-47 32-48 33-49 34-50
35-51 36-53 37-54 38-55 39-56 40-57 41-59 42-60
43-61 44-62 45-63 46-65 47-66 48-67 49-68
(d1) Maximum Sentences Specified for Class D through Class E Felonies. – Unless
provided otherwise in a statute establishing a punishment for a specific crime, for each minimum
term of imprisonment in the chart in subsection (c) of this section, expressed in months, the
corresponding maximum term of imprisonment, also expressed in months, is as specified in the
table below for Class D through Class E felonies. The first figure in each cell of the table is the
minimum term and the second is the maximum term.
15-36 16-38 17-39 18-40 19-41 20-42 21-44 22-45
23-46 24-47 25-48 26-50 27-51 28-52 29-53 30-54
31-56 32-57 33-58 34-59 35-60 36-62 37-63 38-64
39-65 40-66 41-68 42-69 43-70 44-71 45-72 46-74
47-75 48-76 49-77 50-78 51-80 52-81 53-82 54-83
55-84 56-86 57-87 58-88 59-89 60-90 61-92 62-93
63-94 64-95 65-96 66-98 67-99 68-100 69-101 70-102
71-104 72-105 73-106 74-107 75-108 76-110 77-111 78-112
79-113 80-114 81-116 82-117 83-118 84-119 85-120 86-121
87-123 88-124 89-125 90-126 91-128 92-129 93-130 94-131
95-132 96-134 97-135 98-136 99-137 100-138 101-140 102-141
103-142 104-143 105-144 106-146 107-147 108-148 109-149 110-150
111-152 112-153 113-156 114-155 115-156 116-158 117-159 118-160
Page 2 House Bill 575-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
119-161 120-162 121-164 122-165 123-166 124-167 125-168 126-170
127-171 128-172 129-173 130-174 131-176 132-177 133-178 134-179
135-180 136-182 137-183 138-184 139-185 140-186 141-188 142-189
143-190 144-191 145-192 146-194 147-195 148-196 149-197 150-198
151-200 152-201 153-202 154-203 155-204 156-206 157-207 158-208
159-209 160-210 161-212 162-213 163-214 164-215 165-216 166-218
167-219 168-220 169-221 170-222 171-224 172-225 173-226 174-227
175-228 176-230 177-231 178-232 179-233 180-234 181-236 182-237
183-238 184-239 185-240 186-242 187-243 188-244 189-245 190-246
191-248 192-249 193-250 194-251 195-252 196-254 197-255 198-256
199-257 200-258 201-260 202-261 203-262 204-263 205-264 206-266
207-267 208-268 209-269 210-270 211-272 212-273 213-274 214-275
215-276 216-278 217-279 218-280 219-281 220-282 221-284 222-285
223-286 224-287 225-288 226-290 227-291 228-292 229-293 230-294
231-296 232-297.
(e) Maximum Sentences Specified for Class B1 through Class E Class C Felonies for
Minimum Terms up to 339 Months. Unless provided otherwise in a statute establishing a
punishment for a specific crime, for each minimum term of imprisonment in the chart in
subsection (c) of this section, expressed in months, the corresponding maximum term of
imprisonment, also expressed in months, is as specified in the table below for Class B1 through
Class E Class C felonies. The first figure in each cell of the table is the minimum term and the
second is the maximum term.
15-30 16-32 17-33 18-34 19-35 20-36 21-38 22-39
23-40 24-41 25-42 26-44 27-45 28-46 29-47 30-48
31-50 32-51 33-52 34-53 35-54 36-56 37-57 38-58
39-59 40-60 41-62 42-63 43-64 44-65 45-66 46-68
47-69 48-70 49-71 50-72 51-74 52-75 53-76 54-77
55-78 56-80 57-81 58-82 59-83 60-84 61-86 62-87
63-88 64-89 65-90 66-92 67-93 68-94 69-95 70-96
71-98 72-99 73-100 74-101 75-102 76-104 77-105 78-106
79-107 80-108 81-110 82-111 83-112 84-113 85-114 86-116
87-117 88-118 89-119 90-120 91-122 92-123 93-124 94-125
95-126 96-128 97-129 98-130 99-131 100-132 101-134 102-135
103-136 104-137 105-138 106-140 107-141 108-142 109-143 110-144
111-146 112-147 113-148 114-149 115-150 116-152 117-153 118-154
119-155 120-156 121-158 122-159 123-160 124-161 125-162 126-164
127-165 128-166 129-167 130-168 131-170 132-171 133-172 134-173
135-174 136-176 137-177 138-178 139-179 140-180 141-182 142-183
143-184 144-185 145-186 146-188 147-189 148-190 149-191 150-192
151-194 152-195 153-196 154-197 155-198 156-200 157-201 158-202
159-203 160-204 161-206 162-207 163-208 164-209 165-210 166-212
167-213 168-214 169-215 170-216 171-218 172-219 173-220 174-221
175-222 176-224 177-225 178-226 179-227 180-228 181-230 182-231
183-232 184-233 185-234 186-236 187-237 188-238 189-239 190-240
191-242 192-243 193-244 194-245 195-246 196-248 197-249 198-250
199-251 200-252 201-254 202-255 203-256 204-257 205-258 206-260
207-261 208-262 209-263 210-264 211-266 212-267 213-268 214-269
215-270 216-272 217-273 218-274 219-275 220-276 221-278 222-279
223-280 224-281 225-282 226-284 227-285 228-286 229-287 230-288
231-290 232-291 233-292 234-293 235-294 236-296 237-297 238-298
239-299 240-300 241-302 242-303 243-304 244-305 245-306 246-308
House Bill 575-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
247-309 248-310 249-311 250-312 251-314 252-315 253-316 254-317
255-318 256-320 257-321 258-322 259-323 260-324 261-326 262-327
263-328 264-329 265-330 266-332 267-333 268-334 269-335 270-336
271-338 272-339 273-340 274-341 275-342 276-344 277-345 278-346
279-347 280-348 281-350 282-351 283-352 284-353 285-354 286-356
287-357 288-358 289-359 290-360 291-362 292-363 293-364 294-365
295-366 296-368 297-369 298-370 299-371 300-372 301-374 302-375
303-376 304-377 305-378 306-380 307-381 308-382 309-383 310-384
311-386 312-387 313-388 314-389 315-390 316-392 317-393 318-394
319-395 320-396 321-398 322-399 323-400 324-401 325-402 326-404
327-405 328-406 329-407 330-408 331-410 332-411 333-412 334-413
335-414 336-416 337-417 338-418 339-419.
44-77 45-78 46-80 47-81 48-82 49-83 50-84 51-86
52-87 53-88 54-89 55-90 56-92 57-93 58-94 59-95
60-96 61-98 62-99 63-100 64-101 65-102 66-104 67-105
68-106 69-107 70-108 71-110 72-111 73-112 74-113 75-114
76-116 77-117 78-118 79-119 80-120 81-122 82-123 83-124
84-125 85-126 86-128 87-129 88-130 89-131 90-132 91-134
92-135 93-136 94-137 95-138 96-140 97-141 98-142 99-143
100-144 101-146 102-147 103-148 104-149 105-150 106-152 107-153
108-154 109-155 110-156 111-158 112-159 113-160 114-161 115-162
116-164 117-165 118-166 119-167 120-168 121-170 122-171 123-172
124-173 125-174 126-176 127-177 128-178 129-179 130-180 131-182
132-183 133-184 134-185 135-186 136-188 137-189 138-190 139-191
140-192 141-194 142-195 143-196 144-197 145-198 146-200 147-201
148-202 149-203 150-204 151-206 152-207 153-208 154-209 155-210
156-212 157-213 158-214 159-215 160-216 161-218 162-219 163-220
164-221 165-222 166-224 167-225 168-226 169-227 170-228 171-230
172-231 173-232 174-233 175-234 176-236 177-237 178-238 179-239
180-240 181-242 182-243 183-244 184-245 185-246 186-248 187-249
188-250 189-251 190-252 191-254 192-255 193-256 194-257 195-258
196-260 197-261 198-262 199-263 200-264 201-266 202-267 203-268
204-269 205-270 206-272 207-273 208-274 209-275 210-276 211-278
212-279 213-280 214-281 215-282 216-284 217-285 218-286 219-287
220-288 221-290 222-291 223-292 224-293 225-294 226-296 227-297
228-298 229-299 230-300 231-302 232-303 233-304 234-305 235-306
236-308 237-309 238-310 239-311 240-312 241-314 242-315 243-316
244-317 245-318 246-320 247-321 248-322 249-323 250-324 251-326
252-327 253-328 254-329 255-330 256-332 257-333 258-334 259-335
260-336 261-338 262-339 263-340 264-341 265-342 266-344 267-345
268-346 269-347 270-348 271-350 272-351 273-352 274-353 275-354
276-356 277-357 278-358 279-359 280-360 281-362 282-363 283-364
284-365 285-366 286-368 287-369 288-370 289-371 290-372 291-374
292-375 293-376 294-377 295-378 296-380 297-381 298-382 299-383
300-384 301-386 302-387 303-388 304-389 305-390 306-392 307-393
308-394 309-395 310-396 311-398 312-399 313-400 314-401 315-402
316-404 317-405 318-406 319-407 320-408 321-410 322-411 323-412
324-413 325-414 326-416 327-417 328-418 329-419 330-420 331-422
332-423 333-424 334-425 335-426 336-428 337-429 338-430 339-431.
(e1) Maximum Sentences Specified for Class B1 through Class E Class C Felonies for
Minimum Terms of 340 Months or More. – Unless provided otherwise in a statute establishing
Page 4 House Bill 575-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a punishment for a specific crime, when the minimum sentence is 340 months or more, the
corresponding maximum term of imprisonment shall be equal to the sum of the minimum term
of imprisonment and twenty percent (20%) of the minimum term of imprisonment, rounded to
the next highest month, plus 12 24 additional months.
(f) Maximum Sentences Specified for Class B1 Through Class E Sex Offenses. – Unless
provided otherwise in a statute establishing a punishment for a specific crime, for offenders
sentenced for a Class B1 through E felony that is a reportable conviction subject to the
registration requirement of Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes, the maximum term
of imprisonment shall be equal to the sum of the minimum term of imprisonment and twenty
percent (20%) of the minimum term of imprisonment, rounded to the next highest month, plus
60 additional months."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
House Bill 575-Second Edition Page 5